Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0200.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1105. (1) As used in this act: (a) "Adulterated" means food to which any of the following apply: (i) It bears or contains any an added poisonous or added deleterious substance that may render it injurious to health unless the substance is not an added substance and the quantity of that substance in the food does not ordinarily render it injurious to health. (ii) It bears or contains any an added poisonous or added deleterious substance, other than a substance that is a pesticide chemical in or on a raw agricultural commodity, ; a food additive, ; or a color additive considered unsafe within the meaning of subsection (2). (iii) It is a raw agricultural commodity that bears or contains a pesticide chemical considered unsafe within the meaning of subsection (2). (iv) It bears or contains any a food additive considered unsafe within the meaning of subsection (2). However, if a pesticide chemical has been is used in or on a raw agricultural commodity in conformity with an exemption granted or limitation prescribed under subsection (2) and the raw agricultural commodity has been is subjected to processing, the residue of that pesticide chemical remaining in or on that processed food is, notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (2) and this subdivision, not considered unsafe if that residue in or on the raw agricultural commodity has been is removed to the extent possible in good manufacturing practice and if the concentration of that residue in the processed food when ready to eat is not greater than the tolerance prescribed for the raw agricultural commodity. (v) It is or contains a new animal drug or conversion product of a new animal drug that is unsafe within the meaning of section 360b 512 of the federal act, 21 USC 360b. (vi) It consists in whole or in part of a diseased, contaminated, filthy, putrid, or decomposed substance or it is otherwise unfit for food. (vii) It has been was produced, prepared, packed, or held under unsanitary conditions in which it and may have become contaminated with filth or in which it may have been rendered diseased, unwholesome, or injurious to health. (viii) It is the product of a diseased animal or an animal that has died other than by slaughter or that has been was fed uncooked garbage or uncooked offal from a slaughterhouse. (ix) Its container is composed, in whole or in part, of any a poisonous or deleterious substance that may render the contents injurious to health. (x) A valuable constituent has been is in whole or in part omitted or abstracted from the food; a substance has been is substituted wholly or in part for the food; damage or inferiority has been is concealed in any manner; or a substance has been is added to, the food or mixed with, or packed with the food so as to increase its bulk or weight, reduce its quality or strength, or make it appear better or of greater value than it is. (xi) It is confectionery and has is partially or completely imbedded in it any with a nonnutritive object except if, as provided by rules, the object is of practical functional value to the confectionery product and would not render the product injurious or hazardous to health; it is confectionery and bears or contains any alcohol other than alcohol not in excess of 1/2 of 1% 0.5% by volume derived solely from the use of flavoring extracts; or it is confectionery and bears or contains any a nonnutritive substance except a nonnutritive substance such as harmless coloring, harmless flavoring, harmless resinous glaze not in excess of 4/10 of 1%, 0.4%, harmless natural wax not in excess of 4/10 of 1%, 0.4%, harmless natural gum and pectin or any chewing gum by reason of its containing harmless nonnutritive masticatory substances which is in or on the confectionery by reason of its use for some practical functional purpose in the manufacture, packaging, or storage of such confectionery if the use of the substance does not promote deception of the consumer or otherwise result in adulteration or misbranding in violation of this act. For the purpose of avoiding or resolving uncertainty as to the application of this subdivision, the director may issue rules allowing or prohibiting the use of particular nonnutritive substances. (xii) It is, or bears, or contains any a color additive that is unsafe within the meaning of subsection (2). (xiii) It has been is intentionally subjected to radiation, unless the use of the radiation was is in conformity with a rule or exemption under this act or a regulation or exemption under the federal act. (xiv) It is bottled water that contains a substance at a level higher than allowed under this act. (b) "Advertisement" means a representation disseminated in any manner or by any means, other than by labeling, for the purpose of inducing, or which is likely to induce, directly or indirectly, the purchase of food. (c) "Agricultural use operation" means a maple syrup production facility or similar food establishment that finishes a raw commodity and is integral to the agricultural production of, and is located at, a farm. An agricultural use operation is not considered a food processor or retail processing operation for purposes of personal or real property but must meet those same standards and licensing requirements as prescribed in under this act. (d) "Bed and breakfast" means a private residence that offers sleeping accommodations to transient tenants in 14 or fewer rooms for rent, is the innkeeper's residence in which where the innkeeper resides while renting the rooms to transient tenants, and serves breakfasts, or other meals in the case of a bed and breakfast described in section 1107(t)(ii), at no extra cost to its transient tenants. A bed and breakfast is not a food service establishment if exempt under section 1107(t)(ii) or (iii). (e) "Color additive" means a dye, pigment, or other substance that is made by a process of synthesis or similar artifice or is extracted, isolated, or otherwise derived, with or without intermediate or final change of identity from a vegetable, animal, mineral, or other source, or when added or applied to a food or any part of a food is capable alone or through reaction with other substances of imparting color to the food. Color additive does not include any a material that is exempt or hereafter is exempted under the federal act. This subdivision does not apply to any a pesticide chemical, soil or plant nutrient, or other agricultural chemical solely because of its effect in aiding, retarding, or otherwise affecting, directly or indirectly, the growth of other natural physiological process of produce of the soil and thereby affecting its color, whether before or after harvest. Color includes black, white, and intermediate grays. (f) "Consumer" means an individual who is a member of the public , that takes possession of food, is does not functioning function in the capacity of an operator of a food establishment or food processor, and does not offer the food for resale. (g) "Contaminated with filth" means contaminated as a result of not being securely protected from dust, dirt, and, as far as may be necessary by all reasonable means, from all foreign or injurious contaminations.contaminants. (h) "Continental breakfast" means the serving of only non-potentially-hazardous non-potentially hazardous food such as a roll, pastry or doughnut, fruit juice, or hot beverage, but may also include individual portions of milk and other items incidental to those foods. (i) "Core item" means a provision in the food code that is not designated as a priority item or a priority foundation item. Core item includes both any of the following: (i) (A) An item that usually relates to general sanitation, operational controls, sanitation standard operating procedures (SSOPs), facilities or structures, equipment design, or general maintenance. (ii) (B) The requirements of section sections 2129(2) and 6152(1). (iii) The requirements of section 6101(1)(d). (j) "Cottage food operation" means a person an individual who produces or packages cottage food products only in a kitchen of that person's individual's primary domestic residence within this state. (k) "Cottage food product" means a food that is not potentially hazardous food as that term is defined in the food code. Examples of cottage Cottage food product include, includes, but are is not limited to, jams, jellies, dried fruit, candy, cereal, granola, dry mixes, vinegar, dried herbs, and baked goods that do not require temperature control for safety. Cottage food product does not include any of the following: (i) A potentially hazardous food regulated under 21 CFR parts 113 and 114, examples of which include, including, but are not limited to, meat and poultry products, ; salsa, ; milk products, ; bottled water and other beverages, ; and home-produced ice products. Cottage food product also does not include canned (ii) Canned low-acid fruits. or acidified (iii) Acidified vegetables. and other (iv) Other canned foods, except for jams, jellies, and preserves, as those terms are defined in 21 CFR part 150. (2) Any An added poisonous or added deleterious substance, food additive, pesticide chemical in or on a raw agricultural commodity, or color additive is considered unsafe for the purpose of subsection (1)(a), unless there is in effect a federal regulation or exemption from regulation under the federal act, the federal meat inspection act, 21 USC 601 to 683, the poultry products inspection act, 21 USC 451 to 472, or another federal statute, or a rule limiting the quantity of the substance, and the use or intended use of the substance, and the use or intended use of the substance conforms to the terms prescribed by the federal regulation, or exemption, or the rule. Sec. 3113. (1) A Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a county, city, village, or township shall not regulate those aspects of a food service establishments establishment that are subject to regulation under this act except to the extent necessary to carry out the responsibility of a local health department to implement the licensing provisions of chapter IV. A county, city, village, or township may adopt and enforce an ordinance that is more restrictive than section 6-501.115(B)(6) of the food code as set forth in section 6101(1)(d). (2) This chapter does not relieve the applicant for a license or a licensee license holder from the responsibility for of securing a local permit or complying with applicable local codes, regulations, or ordinances not in conflict with this act. Sec. 6101. (1) Chapters 1 through 8 of the food code are incorporated by reference except as amended and modified as follows: (a) Where provisions of this act and rules specify different requirements. (b) Section 3-401.14 is modified to read as follows: "3-401.14 Non-Continuous Cooking of Raw Animal Foods. Raw animal foods that are cooked using a non-continuous cooking process shall must be: (A) Subject to an initial heating process that is no longer than 60 minutes in duration;P (B) Immediately after initial heating, cooled according to the time and temperature parameters specified for cooked potentially hazardous food (time/temperature control for safety food) under paragraph 3-501.14(A);P (C) After cooling, held frozen or cold, as specified for potentially hazardous food (time/temperature control for safety food) under paragraph 3-501.16(A)(2);P (D) Prior to Before sale or service, cooked using a process that heats all parts of the food to a time/temperature specified in paragraph 3-401.11(A);P (E) Cooled according to the time and temperature parameters specified for cooked potentially hazardous food (time/temperature control for safety food) under paragraph 3-501.14(A) if not either hot held as specified under paragraph 3-501.16(A), served immediately, or held using time as a public health control as specified under section 3-501.19 after complete cooking;P and (F) Stored as follows: (1) After initial heating but prior to before cooking as specified under paragraph (D) of this section, separate from ready-to-eat foods as specified under paragraph 3-302.11;Pf and (2) After initial heating, but prior to before complete cooking, marked or otherwise identified as foods that must be cooked as specified under paragraph (D) of this section prior to before being offered for sale or service.Pf The food may be identified in any effective manner provided that the marking system is disclosed to the regulatory authority upon request.". (c) Section 2-103.11(L) is modified to read as follows: "Employees are properly trained in food safety as it relates to their assigned duties;Pf and". (d) Section 6-501.115(B) is modified by the addition of subparagraph (6) that reads as follows: "(6) A dog that is controlled by a customer in an outdoor dining area of a food service establishment if all of the following apply: (a) A health or safety hazard will not result from the presence or activities of the dog. (b) All of the following requirements are met: (i) The dog does not pass through the interior of the food service establishment or any playground area of the food service establishment to enter the outdoor dining area. A separate entrance must be provided from the exterior of the food service establishment to the outdoor dining area. (ii) The outdoor dining area is maintained free of visible dog hair, dog dander, and other dog-related waste and debris. The outdoor dining area is cleaned and disinfected appropriately as needed. (iii) Surfaces contaminated by the waste created from a dog's bodily functions are immediately cleaned and disinfected. (iv) Equipment used to clean and that comes in contact with the waste created from a dog's bodily functions is stored separate from all other cleaning equipment and is not used for other cleaning purposes. (v) All dog-related waste or debris is disposed of at least daily outside of the food service establishment in a covered waste receptacle. (vi) An employee who touches a dog or cleans the waste created from a dog's bodily functions does not serve food or beverages or handle tableware until the employee has washed the employee's hands. (vii) The dog is not allowed on a seat, chair, or customer's lap, or allowed to contact a tabletop, countertop, or similar surface in the outdoor dining area. (viii) The dog is not allowed to contact reusable tableware unless the tableware is dedicated to use by dogs and readily distinguishable as such or is provided by the customer handling the dog. (ix) The dog is not allowed in an area where food is prepared. (x) The dog is not unattended. (xi) The customer is 18 years of age or older. (xii) The customer keeps the dog on a leash. (c) The food service establishment does all of the following: (i) Maintains at the food service establishment and makes available to the local health department, department, or a customer on request, written procedures that ensure compliance with the requirements of sub-subparagraph (b). (ii) Before allowing a dog within the food service establishment, notifies the local health department in writing that the food service establishment intends to allow customers' dogs to accompany customers in the outdoor dining area of the food service establishment. The food service establishment shall mail the notice by first-class mail or deliver the notice not less than 30 days before allowing dogs to accompany customers. The notice is effective while the food service establishment remains in business. The food service establishment is not required to mail or deliver more than 1 notice. (d) The food service establishment may do any of the following: (i) Determine the location and the amount of space designated for a customer accompanied by the customer's dog. (ii) Establish a limit on the size and type of dog and any other limitation relating to a customer's dog. (iii) Deny entry or eject from the food service establishment a customer and the customer's dog.". (2) The owner of a dog brought into a food service establishment under subsection (1)(d) is liable for any damage or injury caused by the dog to the food service establishment, an employee of the food service establishment, or a customer of the food service establishment. (3) (2) The director, by rule, may adopt any changes or updates to the food code. (4) (3) The annexes of the food code are considered persuasive authority for interpretation of the food code.